Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5016.06
Witness; demand fees; when.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a witness may demand his or her traveling fees and fee for one day's attendance when the subpoena is served upon him or her, and if the same is not paid, the witness shall not be obliged to obey the subpoena. The fact of such demand and nonpayment shall be stated in the return.

(2) When a subpoena is issued at the request of any agency of state government, the witness shall not be entitled to demand his or her traveling fees and fee for one day's attendance but shall be required to obey the subpoena if, at the time of service upon him or her, he or she is furnished a statement prepared by the agency advising him or her of the rate of travel fees allowable, the fee for each day's attendance pursuant to the subpoena, and that he or she will be paid at such rates following his or her attendance.

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 57.